Utah statutes.
26-21-4.   Per diem and travel expenses of committee members.

A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(1)  Section 63A-3-106;

(2)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(3)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

